Utah statutes.
70A-2a-514.   Waiver of lessee's objections.

(1)  In rejecting goods, a lessee's failure to state a particular defect that is ascertainable by reasonable inspection precludes the lessee from relying on the defect to justify rejection or to establish default:

(a)  if, stated seasonably, the lessor or the supplier could have cured it as provided in Section 70A-2a-513; or

(b)  between merchants if the lessor or the supplier after rejection has made a request in writing for a full and final written statement of all defects on which the lessee proposes to rely.

(2)  A lessee's failure to reserve rights when paying rent or other consideration against documents precludes recovery of the payment for defects apparent in the documents.



Amended by Chapter 42, 2006 General Session

